 We have mice that are four months old, that had diabetes and now don't have it anymore.
 Dr Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Department of Clinical and Scientific Affairs of the Canadian Diabetes Association, said that the research work was still in its infancy.
 As some other experts have shown, he was skeptical about whether it was possible to cure diabetes, and pointed out that the findings for people who already suffered from type 1 diabetes had no significance.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Committee, announced on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the committee had stopped its efforts to inform Bob Dylan about his honor with the Nobel Prize in Literature, after it had not succeeded in reaching him personally.
 Danius said, I have called his closest aide and sent him Emails and very friendly replies.
 Ring's CEO Jamie Siminoff once said that he founded the company after he couldn't hear his doorbell from his garage workshop.
 He said he had built a WLAN doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales had soared after his appearance on a 2013 episode of Shark Tank, although the show's judges had rejected financing his startup.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the Teleshopping-Network QVC.
 Ring has also sued a competing security firm, ADT Corporation.
 While an experimental vaccine seems to be able to lower Ebola mortality, there are currently no medicines that have been proven to be clearly suitable for the treatment of existing infections.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially looked promising, but formal studies showed that it brought less benefit than hoped in terms of preventing deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp served as a control, meaning the scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments to it.
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter of the United States Olympic Committee and accepts it as an absolute necessity that the Olympic family set a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the U S . O . C . that it is in the best interests of our athletes and their sports to advance meaningful change within our organization, rather than to decertify.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could bring to light how abuse in the scope that was so bravely described by the survivors of Lary Nassar could go undetected for so long and welcomes all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal -- to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for the athletes so they can follow their dreams in a safe, positive and self-determined environment.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor for John F. Kennedy and subsequently for the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter in foreign policy and then served from 1977 to 1981 as National Security Advisor (NSA).
 As national security advisor, he supported Carter in the diplomatic handling of world affairs such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of relations between the U.S. and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the Iran hostage crisis in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film with Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone has received nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best actor and best actress, respectively.
 Further nominations include best film, direction, cinematography, costume design, editing, original film score, production design, sound editing, sound mixing and original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song, Lionsgate studio received twenty six nominations, more than any other film studio.
 On Sunday, late, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, in a statement read by the press Secretary, announced that U S . troops would leave Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone call from Trump with the Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would carry out the surveillance of captured ISIS fighters, whose repatriation, the statement said, had been rejected by European countries.
 This confirms not only that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already widely accepted, but also provides details that Fossils in general cannot provide, like color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say that the feathers of this bird were cinnamon-brown on the upper side and light or carotinoid-colored on the underside.
 The find also gives insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Because dinosaur feathers lack a well-developed shaft, the rachis, but have other features of feathers,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or for showing off.
 The researchers claimed that although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample shows the feathers of an adult and no juvenile Daun.
 A car bomb detonated this morning in the Turkish Gaziantep police headquarters, killing two police officers and wounding over twenty others.
 According to the governor's office, nineteen of the injured are police officers.
 The police said they suspected a Daesh militant behind the attack.
 They have found out that the sun functions on the same basic principles as other stars: it was found that the activity of all stars in the system is driven by their luminosity, rotation and nothing else.
 To determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma stream, the luminosity and the rotation are combined.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the Star is in regard to Umpolings of the magnetic field.
 During the voyage, Iwasaki ran into trouble many times.
 He was robbed by Pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, could flee a marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard runs on the frequencies of 2.4 Ghz and 5.0 Ghz.
 This can allow it to be backwards compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radio.
 The speed of 802.11n is significantly faster than that of the predecessor, which had a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, has made no big impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 As Miller was asked for a comment, Miller said,
 We will make efforts to significantly reduce the carbon dioxide emissions per BIP unit by 2020 compared with the level of 2005, said Hu.
 He did not name a number for the cuts, but said they would be made based on China's economic performance.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to avoid the old way of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added that they should not be asked to make commitments that go beyond their development, their responsibility and their capacity.
 The study group on Iraq presented its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any course of action in Iraq at this point will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or a slide into chaos.
 The report starts with a request for an open discourse and consensus building in the USA about a strategy for the Middle East.
 The report stands almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive in regard to Iraq extremely critical and urges an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to reestablish diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Senator and Argentine First Lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced yesterday in La Plata, a city 50 kilometres from Buenos Aires, her candidacy for the Presidency.
 Kirchner announced her intention to run for President in the Argentinean theater, where she began her campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The trigger for the debate was a controversy over spending for the relief and rebuilding after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscally conservative humorists have dubbed Bush's New Orleans deal.
 The criticism of the Liberals on the reconstruction process has focused on the fact that contracts for the reconstruction were given to alleged insiders in Washington.
 More than four million people came to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people was so great that it was not possible for all to gain access to the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 Several large television screens were set up at various locations in Rome so that people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar installations have been installed, seen by numerous people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's earlier policy of concentrating its resources in the intent of raising the agency's success rate, on easy to solve cases, especially on cases of auto theft.
 The Congress began in August 2005 with the funding of the anti-obscenity initiative and laid out that the FBI must set 10 agents for the adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa reached the highest score of the innings, 70 runs, in just 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, showed good performances and achieved a partnership with 100 runs.
 After the loss of the captain's wicket, India scored only 36 runs and lost 7 wickets, thereby ending the innings.
 The U S . President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore in the morning of November 16 and began a one-week tour through Asia.
 He was greeted by Wong Kan Seng, the Deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and spoke with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore, about trade and terrorism issues.
 After a week of losses in the interim election, Bush told the public about the expansion of trade in Asia.
 Premier Stephen Harper agreed after a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton on Tuesday in the PMO to send the Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties for review before the second hearing.
 Layton had during the meeting with the Premier demanded changes to the Conservative's environmental legislation and had called for a "fundamental and complete rewriting of the Conservative's environmental legislation.
 After the Federal Government stepped in to take over the funding of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some parliamentarians have criticised the move as a PR stunt ahead of the Federal election in November.
 Premier John Howard said, however, the measure, providing 45 million Australian dollars, was only to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading the hospitals.
 According to the current bulletin, the measurements of the sea level indicated that a tsunami was triggered in the vicinity of Pago Pago and Niue.
 There were no significant damage or injuries reported from Tonga, though power outages were reported as a result of the Tongaian authorities not receiving the PTWC tsunami warning.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii that are on or in the vicinity of coasts were closed all Wednesday, although the warnings had been lifted.
 U S . President George W . Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean promise a "major step in the direction of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical storm Jerry, is today in the Atlantic ocean.
 Jerry is not expected to pose a threat to land at this time, the National Hurricane Center said.
 The U S . Corps of engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could breach the already damaged dams.
 The Ninth Ward, which during Hurricane Katrina was flooded up to 20 feet high, is currently leading hüfthohes water, as the nearby levee was overtopped.
 On a 100-foot long section, water runs over the dam.
 The Commons-Administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disappointment over the distances when he talked with Wikinews last month.
 Wales lied to us from the beginning, firstly in that he pretended this was for legal reasons, secondly in that he pretended to listen to us,
 The irritations in the community led to the current efforts to draft a guideline regarding sexual content for the Website, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work was largely theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations made by the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect, after which the team sought, would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 Just as the moon pulls the earth and causes tides, the Milky Way also pulls the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 This theory says that the majority of dark matter is in a sort of halo around a Galaxy and consists of many small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming out of the plant.
 The local authorities are urging residents in the vicinity of the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not to drink tap water.
 According to the nuclear watchdog of Japan, radioactive caesium and iodine were found at the atomic power plant.
 The authorities speculate that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel at the site could have been ripped open and possibly leaked.
 The extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis, or XDR-TB, was discovered by Dr Tony Moll in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 In an interview, he said the new variant was, quote,
 Some patients may have picked up the bug in the hospital, thinks Dr Moll, and at least two were medical hospital staff.
 Within a year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Despite this, the proportion of XDR-TB in the overall group of people with TB is still low, 6,000 of the 330,000 people who are infected at any one time in South Africa.
 The satellites, both weighing more than 1,000 pounds, collided 491 miles above the earth at an approximate speed of 17,500 miles per hour.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was violent.
 They're still trying to figure out how extensive the collision was and how the earth will be affected by it.
 The strategic command of the United States defense Department is finding the wreckage.
 The result of the Plotting-Analysis will be published on a public Website.
 A doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is charged with murder after her dead mother was found in the trunk of her car Wednesday in Ohio, authorities say.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying in the street beside the road in T-shirt and underwear, apparently under the influence of strong medication.
 She led the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, was found under blood-soaked blankets.
 The police said the body seemed to have been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported at the end of July.
 The disease is transmitted from pigs and then travels through mosquitoes to humans.
 The outbreak of the disease led the Indian government to employ pig catchers in heavily affected areas, to distribute thousands of mosquito nets and to spray pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million bottles of vaccine against brain inflammation, which will help to arm the health authorities for the next year.
 Plans for vaccines that this year were supposed to be delivered to the historically hardest hit areas have been delayed because of lack of funding and low priority setting compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Słonia went to Sweden, where he began working in the Swedish Post Office three years later,
 He produced over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 The quality and precision of his work are so highly valued that his name is one of the very few generally known names in the field of philately.
 His one thousandth stamp, from the year 2000, shows the splendid painting of David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl's Rühmliche Heldentaten schwedischer Könige, and is listed in the Guinness book of records.
 He was also involved in the designing of many countries' current banknotes, including the Premier Minister portraits on the front of the Canadian 5 and 100 dollar notes.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to a hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at approximately 12:00 GMT the same day.
 A person who worked in a workshop near the accident site said,
 All of them ran back from the accident scene.
 Other items on the agenda in Bali are saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technologies that help developing nations grow in less environmentally damaging ways.
 The United Nations hope to set up a fund to help the countries affected by global warming to cope with the effects.
 The money could be used for flood-resistant housing, better water management and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some, women who wanted to speak over the health of women, were not successful.
 To this conclusion she came based on the numerous positive comments and the encouragement she received both from men and women, who urged that contraceptives be seen as a medical necessity.
 As the fighting stopped after the transport of the wounded to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed on the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 The negotiators tried to defuse the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 11:00 am, a fire was lit by the inmates in the courtyard.
 Bald, the police, who were equipped with protective gear, entered the grounds and pushed the inmates with tear gas into the corner.
 The firefighters were able to extinguish the fire at 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the annual floods that distribute sediments in the river came to a halt.
 This sediment was needed to build sandbars and beaches that served as habitats for wildlife.
 Infolgedessen are two fish species extinct and two more are threatened with extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 The authorities hope that the rise in water level after the flood will be enough to restore eroded sandbanks downstream, although it is only a few feet.
 No tsunami warning was issued and according to the Geophysics Department of Jakarta, there will be no tsunami warning, as the earthquake did not reach the necessary strength of 6.5.
 Although there was no tsunami threat, the residents panicked and began to leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey wept tears at her departure, she assured her fans that she would return.
 This will not be a goodbye. This is the end of a chapter and the beginning of a new chapter.
 The end results of the Presidential and Parliamentary elections in Namibia have indicated that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a large margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation, SWAPO, retained a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 Troops of the coalition and Afghan troops moved into the area to secure the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to support.
 The crash occurred high up in hilly terrain, and it is suspected that it was the result of enemy fire.
 The efforts to find the crash site are hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical welfare organization Mangola, Medecines Sans Frontieres and the World Health Organisation say this is the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 Richard Veerman, spokesperson for Doctors without Borders, said,
 The games started at 10:00 am in great weather and, aside from a little drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared, it was an ideal day for 7s Rugby.
 South Africa, the top-placed team of the tournament, began with a comfortable 26:00 win against Sambia, the fifth-placed team.
 Although the team definitely looked rusty against their Southern sisters, South Africa improved steadily throughout the tournament.
 Their disciplined defense, ball control and excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team that had to be beaten.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum say the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public health risk,
 He had been scheduled to die on Tuesday, but was saved by a not-so-emergency court ruling.
 All cave entrances, also called the Seven Sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show temperature differences between night and day, which indicate that it's probably caves.
 They are colder at day than the surrounding surface and warmer at night.
 Their thermal behavior is not as evenly matched as the great caves on the earth, which often have a fairly constant temperature, but it does match that it's about deep holes in the ground,
 In France, voting is traditionally a Low-Tech experience: the voter isolates themselves in a booth and sticks a preprinted slip of paper, on which the candidate of their choice is written, into an envelope.
 After the officials have confirmed the identity of the voter, the voter throws the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 The French election law lays out the process quite strictly.
 Since 1988, voting urns must be transparent so that voters and observers can verify that no envelopes are present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelopes are inserted except those of the properly counted and authorized voters.
 The candidates can send representatives who can witness every part of the process, and at night the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision and special procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously worldwide on the basis of Spar- and Functionality-Factor on the market, was on the Messe 2007 Taipei IT Month the hot topic.
 But the consumer market for laptop computers will change radically after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by manager Yuan from the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station describes the show as a Radiotheater of the old school with a new and uncanny interpretation.
 In their early days, the show was only shown on the alt-gained Internet radio site TogiNet radio, a site that focuses on talk radio.
 In late 2015, TogiNet founded the AstroNet Radio subsidiary.
 The show originally had local amateur Synchro-Voice actors from East Texas.
 Reports say that extended looting went on all night, while police officers showed no presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 According to one observer, Bishkek fell more and more into a state of anarchy, as gangs of people roamed through the streets and looted consumer goods shops.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the demonstrators from the South for the lawlessness.
 South Africa beat the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a Rugby Union match in the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the South African town of Rustenburg.
 The final score was a win by one point, 21 to 20, which ended the All Blacks' winning streak of 15 games.
 For the Springboks, a five game losing streak came to an end.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The end of the tournament will be next week in Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will play Australia.
 An earthquake hit the West of Montana on Monday at 22:08.
 No immediate reports of damage went to the United States Geological Survey and the National Earthquake Information Center.
 The center of the earthquake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the deadly bird flu H5N1 infected a wild duck found dead Monday in a marshy area near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country in the European Union to have this virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for the widespread death, destruction and terrorization of many millions of earthlings.
 Chambers, an Agnostic, argues that his complaint is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story, which Camille Saint-Saens presented in the French opera, is about an artist, whose life is dominated by the love of drugs and Japan.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain initiated a naval blockade of Germany.
 The former Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, the Texas governor Rick Perry and the Congresswoman Michele Bachmann reached the fourth, fifth and sixth place respectively.
 After the results were in, Gingrich lobbed Santorum, found harsh words for Romney, in whose name negative campaigning against Gingrich had been aired in Iowa.
 Perry explained, he would return to Texas to evaluate the results of today's vote and to decide if there was a further path for him in this race, but later said he would remain in the race and compete in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames straw poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was brought to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center where he subsequently died.
 According to reports, he was in his 20s at the time. In a statement, Bieber said, quote, although I was neither present nor directly involved in this tragic accident, my thoughts and prayers are with the family of the victim.
 The entertainment news Website TMZ has learned that the photographer pulled over on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take photos of the traffic stop before he crossed the street and continued on his way, which led the California highway patrol officer who was conducting the traffic stop to order him back over the street twice.
 According to police, the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will probably not be charged.
 As only eighteen medals are available per day, it has an amount of countries not made it to the podium.
 The Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen yesterday placed ninth in the women's Standings, and Finland with Katja Saarinen, who placed tenth in the same competition.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was eleventh in the standing Super-G of the men, while the Czech Oldrich Jelinek was sixteenth in the sitting Super-G of the men.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez came in at the Super-G of the men as fifteenth, and the New Zealander Adam Hall came in at the Super-G of the men as ninth.
 The visually impaired Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska placed thirteenth in the Super-G, while the South Korean Jong Seork Park placed twenty-fourth in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake of 2010 are blamed for the spread of the disease that broke out near the camp of the troops.
 According to the complaint, the waste from the UN camp was not properly cleaned, which led to bacteria entering the Artibonit River, one of the largest rivers in Haiti.
 Before the arrival of the troops, there had been no problems in Haiti since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy has referred to independent studies that suggest Nepalese UN peacekeepers brought the disease unwittingly to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by the blue helmets.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had taken the patient in stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola virus had occurred.
 The hospital followed protocols for infection control, including separating the patient from others to avoid infection of third parties.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked on several shows in various capacities.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like Taxi, Cheers, and the Tracey Ullman show.
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening create the Simpsons and was responsible for the hiring of the show's first writing team.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of chief producer and received further licensing fees in the tens of millions of dollars each season.
 Xinhua, the Chinese news agency, had reported the planned hijacking of an airplane.
 Later reports said the plane had received a bomb threat and was diverted to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 First reports say that the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was refused permission to land in Ürümqi.
 Air crashes are frequent in Iran, which has an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military use.
 International sanctions have meant that no new planes can be bought.
 At the beginning of the week, three people were killed and three others injured in a helicopter crash.
 Last month Iran suffered its worst airplane crash in years when a passenger plane on its way to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers.
 In the same month, a further passenger plane shot over the end of a runway in Maschhad and collided with a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith have canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was supposed to tour through the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After frontman Steven Tyler injured himself during a performance on August 5, they canceled the tour.
 Murray lost the first set in the tiebreak, after both men held every single service game in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but even this time a tie break was necessary after the 6-6 was reached.
 Potros shoulder was treated in the meantime, but he was able to return to the field.
 The vehicle itself was taken away from the scene of the accident at approximately 1200 GMT on the same day.
 Famous singers throughout the land presented Bhajans, devotional songs, to Shri Shyam's feet.
 Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, accompanied by Raju Khandelwal.
 Lakkha Singh then took over the leadership in singing the Bhajans.
 Baba Shyam were served 108 Teller Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism 56 different edible things like sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes etc, which are offered to the God)
 Lakkha Singh presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan also, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the keynote presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the Controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution Console.
 Similar to a TV remote control, the Controller uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate the user's position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and had to retire shortly after the start.
 His teammate led the race most of the time, but ended it just after his pit stop, probably because of a strongly clamped right front tire.
 Shortly after Alonso, Michael also ended his race due to damage to the Radiator, which was caused by numerous fights during the race.
 She is very sweet and sings also quite well, he said, according to a transcript of the press conference.
 I was at every rehearsal here for it with all my heart.
 About three minutes after takeoff, a board camera showed numerous pieces of insulation foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is not believed that they damaged the shuttle in any way.
 N . Wayne Hale Jr, head of the shuttle program at NASA, said the foam fell off after the point at which we were concerned.
 After five minutes, the wind came up, about a minute later the wind reached 70 km/h. Then it began to rain, but the drops were so hard and large that they stung like needles on the skin. Then hail fell from the sky, people screamed and ran around.
 I have my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in a wheelchair, over whom people just simply pushed and shoved them.
 NHK reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported that the earthquake had no effects and that reactors number one and two of the Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 It is reported that about 9,400 households in the region have no water and about 100 have no power.
 Some streets were damaged and rail traffic in the affected areas was disrupted. The airport in Noto, Ishikawa Prefecture, remains closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office building.
 Three other bombs detonated within two hours of government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, although no final figures are known.
 Both Cyanuric acid and Melamine were found in urine samples from pets that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The two connections react with each other and form crystals, which, according to the researchers of the University, can hinder the kidney activity.
 The researchers discovered crystals in the cat's urine that had formed through the addition of Melamine and Zyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to the composition found in the urine of affected pets when compared by infrared spectroscopy.
 I do not know if you knew this, but most goods from Central America came into our country free of duty.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed in Central American countries. We care about you.
 This appeared to me not to be fair,
 I say to people, look, we want to be treated the same way we treat other people.
 The California governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that prohibits the sale or rental of Video games that contain violence to minors.
 The law proposal calls for video games sold in the state of California to be labeled with the number eighteen and for the sale to minors to be punished with a fine of one thousand dollars.
 The director of the state's Attorney-General, Kier Starmer QC, gave a statement this morning in which he announced the prosecution of both Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by Ed Davey, who is expected to take over the job of Economic Secretary, which Davey is just leaving.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before the Westminster Magistrates Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback is the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery for his face.
 The weapon of Uka had a loading block, as he aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has since then been under chronic pain, is blind in one eye, and has a part of his skull missing, his face had to be reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider said via a Video link from a base of the U S . Air Force in his hometown.
 Over the event on Wednesday, Carpanedo took part in the championship in two individual races.
 Their first was the slalom, in which they received a Did not Finish in their first run. 36 of the 116 participants received the same result in this run.
 Their other race, the giant slalom, she finished with a combined time of 4:41.30, which was 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first placed Claudia Lösch of Austria and 1:09.02 minutes faster than Gyöngyi Dani of Hungary, who finished in ninth place.
 Four skiers of the Krückenskifahren came not into the goal, and 45 of the altogether 117 skiers in the Riesenslalom could not place themselves in the race.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh have found the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The Deputy Inspector General D. K. Arya said, we have arrested five persons who have raped the Swiss woman and have seized her mobile phone and laptop.
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanja, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The police president Chandra Shekhar Solanki said the accused had appeared in court with covered faces.
 Although three people were in the house when the car ran in, none of them were injured.
 The driver, however, sustained severe injuries to his head.
 The street on which the accident had occurred was temporarily closed while the rescue services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was subsequently transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya was in the meantime charged with the murder of her son at Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is in custody until the charges are brought and the trial is held, but eye-witness statements could be falsified, as her image has been widely published.
 This is otherwise common practice in Britain, but the Scottish justice system works differently, and the courts have deemed the publication of photos as potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee remarks,
 The Crown Office, which is leading the prosecution, has indicated to journalists that it will not be making any further comments until at least the charge is brought.
 According to the leak, the document refers to the border dispute in which the Palestinians demand a return to the status quo ante, before the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other topics that are allegedly covered include the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a military presence in the Jordan Valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the Palestinian Authority wants such a presence only for five years.
 The guards of the accompanying trial to curb the plague should be closely watched by Rangers, as the trial was monitored and its effectiveness assessed.
 In partnership with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, qualified volunteers were recruited through the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, the executive director of Park Conservation and Heritage in the NPWS, the four hunters selected for the first operation received comprehensive safety and training.
 Martelly yesterday swore in a new Provisional Election Commission (CEP) with nine members.
 It is Martelly's fifth CEP within four years.
 Last month, a Presidial Commission recommended the resignation of the previous CEP as part of a package of measures to steer the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was Martelly's response to the widespread regime-critical protests that began in October.
 The trigger for the partly violent protests was the non-implementation of elections, some of which had been due since 2011.
 Over 60 cases of overheating were reported, resulting in six fires and four people suffering minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it had been notified of 27 incidents involving the devices.
 Last week, METI announced that it had been informed by apple of over 34 additional cases of Overheating that the company had designated as not serious.
 The Ministry reacted by describing the delay of the report by apple as a real bedaub.
 The earthquake struck Mariana at 07:19 am local time (21:19 GMT on Friday).
 The office of emergency management of the northern Marianas said that no damage was reported in the country.
 Also, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center had declared that there was no indication of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine policeman took tourists from Hong Kong as hostages by hijacking their bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines.
 Rolando Mendoza shot with his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued and there are at least six confirmed deaths so far.
 Six hostages, including the children and the elderly, were released early, along with the Philippine photographers.
 The photographers took the place of an older woman as she had to go to the toilet, Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and chose a medical career.
 He trained as a birth attendant and took up work in the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working in the hospital, Liggins began in his spare time to investigate preterm labour.
 His research showed that the application of a hormone accelerated the lung maturation of the Foetus.
 Xinhua reported that investigators of the government on Wednesday recovered two black box flight recorders.
 Ringer colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, Luna was the first queen of the Extremes, my first manager, Luna died in the night of the two moons, very unique, just like her.
 Dustin Runnels, Goldust, gave the following comment: Luna was just as crazy as I was, maybe even crazier.
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed before the 2010 Federal Elections, the proportion of those opposed to Australia becoming a Republic has increased by 8 per cent since 2008.
 The then-incumbent Prime Minister Julia Gillard, during the 2010 Federal election campaign, stated that she believed Australia should become a Republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed share this view and want Elizabeth II to be the last Australian Monarch.
 Twenty nine percent of those surveyed said Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while thirty one percent said Australia should never become a Republic.
 The gold medalist at the Olympic games was supposed to swim in the disciplines of 100 m and 200 m freestyle as well as in three relay staffs, but because of his many complaints his fitness was doubted.
 He was not able to take the required medication to overcome his pain, as they are banned at the Commonwealth Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 Several people confirmed the discovery using different hardware and software in early February, and on Tuesday it was announced.
 Comets were possibly a source for the water supply of the earth, along with organic matter that can form proteins and enable life.
 Comets, which have been in collision with the earth long ago, promise the scientists insights into how planets, especially the earth, came into being.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month to legalize same-sex marriage.
 He described the rumors as political nonsense and nonsense.
 It is speculated that he could run for the office of President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system the FAA claims would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, reducing carbon emissions.
 It relies on satellite-based technology instead of the older technology based on ground radar to enable flight controllers to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transport is being put in place and the overground trains will not be stopping at Wembley. There are no parking facilities or Park and Ride facilities available on site.
 With the concern over lack of transportation growing, the likelihood of the game being played behind closed doors grew.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science reported the emergence of a new bird species on the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers at Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species had developed within only two generations, although previously it had been thought that this process would take much longer because of the mating between a native Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and the introduced cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be processed into various forms. It can be rolled into tiny forms.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be twisted and braided, hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be very thinly fashioned and glued onto other metal. It can be made so thin that it sometimes was used to decorate hand-painted pictures, called picture hand-writings, in books, called picture hand-writings.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator with red coalsaft.
 The kohl's sap changes its color, depending on how acid or basic the chemical is.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) in the tested chemicals.
 Hydrogen ions are protons to which their electrons have been removed (since hydrogen atoms consist of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dry powders together and then form them with clean, wet hands into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels weird and builds a kind of protective layer.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Rests of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities on Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Even in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, there were toilets. In Roman culture, toilets were sometimes part of public bathhouses, which men and women visited in mixed company.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it back almost instantly down to earth.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket, scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view a little bit.
 It takes a gigantic rocket with a height of more than 100 feet to shoot a satellite or a telescope into space.
 The wheel has changed the world in an incredible way. The greatest service the wheel has given us is very much simpler and faster transport.
 It has brought us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Among them are cats of medium size, which eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats, including free-roaming house cats, that eat much smaller prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche, a special task that each cat has and that ensures that they do not compete with other cats.
 Lions are the most social cats. They live in large groups, called prides.
 The Ruddles consist of one to three related adult males, plus up to thirty females and young.
 Women normally have a close relationship with each other when they live in a large family with sisters and daughters.
 Lion Rudel act similarly to Wolf Rudel or dog Rudel, animals that behave surprisingly similar to lions, but not to other big cats, and are just as deadly to their prey.
 As a versatile athlete, the tiger can climb, swim, jump great distances, and pull with the fivefold strength of a strong man.
 The tiger is in the same group (genus Panthera) as lions, Leopards and Jaguars, the only four cats that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger sounds not so much like the full-mouthed roar of the lion as it does a set of grumbled words.
 Ozelots eat small animals, and when they can, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists think Ocelots use their sense of smell to track and locate their prey, sniffing where they have been on the ground.
 They can see very well in the dark with night vision and move unnoticed. Ocelots hunt their prey by optically blending in with their surroundings and then pouncing on their prey.
 If a small group of living things (a small population) is separated from the main population, from which it stems,
 This new environment has other resources and other competitors, so that the new population needs different features or adaptations in order to be a strong competitor than what it previously needed.
 The original population has not changed at all, it still needs the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, and then it looks less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, two populations look so different that they can no longer be assigned to the same species.
 This process we call speciation, which simply means the emergence of new species.
 Plants generate oxygen, which humans breathe in, and they take up the carbon dioxide that humans breathe out (that is, exhale).
 Plants produce their food through photosynthesis, and they also give shade.
 We build our houses out of plants and make clothing out of plants. We eat plants mainly. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the largest predator of its time, so it feared nothing except other Mosasaurus.
 His long fangs were equipped with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an additional set on the palate, which meant that there was no escape for any creature that crossed his path.
 We don't know for sure, but he could have had a forked tongue . He ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and maybe even other mosasaurs.
 He grabbed at everything that came into the water, even a great dinosaur like the T. Rex was no match for him.
 While the majority of their food is known to us, the Romans had their share of strange or unusual feasting, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a kind of rodent called Siebenschläfer.
 Another difference was that the poor people and women ate their food on stools, while the rich men preferred joint Banketts, where they lay on their sides while they ate their meals.
 Courts of ancient Rome could not contain any foods that came from America or Asia in later centuries.
 They had, for example, neither maize nor tomatoes nor potatoes nor cacao, and no old Roman had ever tasted a Turkey.
 Babylonians built a temple for each of their gods, which was considered the house of the god.
 Man brought the gods offerings and the priests tried through ceremonies and festivals to meet the will of the gods.
 Each temple had an open temple courtyard and then an inner Altar-Room, which only priests were allowed to enter.
 Sometimes special pyramid-shaped towers, Zikkurats, were built as part of the temple.
 The tip of the tower was a special sanctuary for the God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, houses came to have no great significance.
 The greater part of the Hebrew family's life played itself out under the open sky.
 The women cooked in the yard. Shops consisted simply of open shop fronts. Stone was used for building houses.
 In the land of Canaan there were no large forests, so that wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated in the old Norse Sagas, it is said that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder, and when he traveled further West, he found Greenland and gave it the name Greenland.
 But regardless of his discovery, Eskimo tribes lived there at that time.
 Although all the countries were Scandinavian, there were many differences between the people, the Kings, the customs and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie, the Templar's legacy, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 That's correct, although on the back of the document, something is written, it's not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, the words, “original Declaration of Independence, dated the fourth of July, 1776” are written upside down.
 Though no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that the great Pergamum document, which is 29¾ inches by 24½ inches, was rolled together at the beginning of its life.
 It is possible, then, that the remark was simply added as a designation.
 The landing at D-Day and the ensuing battles freed the North of France, but the South was still not free.
 He was ruled by the Vichy French, who in 1940 had made peace with the Germans and were working with the invaders, rather than fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies fell in Southern France, the invasion was called operation Dragoon.
 After only two weeks, the Americans and the French liberation troops had freed the South of France and were turning their attention to Germany.
 A civilization is a distinct culture shared by a significant group of people who live and work together, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or state.
 City-States are the precursors of nations, a civilized culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a cultural footprint, and a proper distribution.
 Smaller cultures often disappear without leaving relevant historical records and miss out on being recognized as a real civilization.
 During the revolutionary wars, the thirteen States formed a weak central government, which consisted only of the Congress.
 Congress was not empowered to levy taxes, and since there was neither a national executive nor a national judiciary, it relied on the authorities of the States, which often did not cooperate.
 He had no power to set aside tax laws and tariffs between the States.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all states before they could be changed, and the States took the central government so lightly that their representatives often were absent.
 The Italian national football team is together with the German national football team the second most successful in the world and was FIFA world champion in 2006.
 Sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor sport.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, and Italians compete in international competitions and the Olympic games.
 Japan possesses nearly 7,000 Islands, making it the seventh largest Island in the world.
 Due to the cluster of Islands, Japan is geographically often referred to as an Archipelago.
 The beginning of Taiwan goes back to the 15th century, when European seafarers passed by there and documented the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 1624, the Dutch East India company founded a settlement in the southwest of Taiwan, thereby leading a change in the grain-growing methods of the aborigines and employing Chinese workers on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In the year 1683, forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control over Taiwan's Western and Northern coastal regions and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing empire in the year 1885.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war, the Qing dynasty government signed the Shimonoseki Treaty, in which it ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists mainly of three buildings, namely the Intihuatana, the sun temple and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex were rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and the restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the world's most widely used still image format is 35 mm, which is the predominant film size at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but even more importantly, its image format has been adopted by the image sensor formats of Digital cameras.
 In fact, the so-called 35 mm format is actually 36 mm wide and 24 mm high.
 The side ratio of this format (divided by twelve, to obtain the simplest integer ratio) is therefore designated as 3:2.
 Many common formats (the APS format family, for example) have exactly the same or a very similar aspect ratio.
 The much-maligned and often-mocked third-rule is a simple guideline that creates Dynamics and at the same time, maintains a sense of order in a picture.
 It says that the intersection point of the lines that divide a picture vertically and horizontally is the most effective place for the main motif.
 In this period of European history, the rich and powerful Catholic Church stood on trial.
 For over a thousand years, the Christian religion had held the European States together, despite different languages and customs.
 His All-Powerfulness controlled everyone, from the King to the common citizen.
 One of the important Christian beliefs says that money is meant to be used to alleviate pain and poverty, and that it is the money of the churches that is meant to do just that.
 The central power of the church had been in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and money led many to question whether this principle was being adhered to.
 Soon after the outbreak of fighting, Britain initiated a sea blockade against Germany.
 The strategy proved effective, as it cut off the country from vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated generally accepted international law, which had been codified through several international accords of the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships from entering whole sea lanes, which was a danger even to neutral ships.
 Da the reaction to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted U-Boat warfare.
 In the 1920s, pacifism and isolation were the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and countries.
 After the experience of the horrors and atrocities of World War I, the nations wanted to avoid another such situation in the future.
 In late 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 He came to the USA with 4 cents in his possession, a book of poems and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his boss at his previous job, to Thomas Edison.
 China had a unique method of showing different eras. Each time span in China and each family that was in power was a different dynasty.
 Between the individual dynasties, there were also unstable times of divided provinces, the best-known of which was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted between the Han and the Jin dynasties for sixty years.
 In those days, bitter wars were waged among many nobles who fought for the throne.
 The time of the three kingdoms was one of the bloodiest epochs in the history of ancient China, thousands of people died in the struggle for the highest throne in the great Palace of Xi'An.
 There are a lot of social and political effects like the use of the metric system, a shift away from absolutism to Republicanism and nationalism, and the belief that the land belongs to the people and not to a ruler alone.
 Also, after the revolution, all professions were open to all male applicants, so that the most ambitious and best could succeed.
 The same goes for the military, because instead of class-based Army rank lists, the Army-Rank lists were based on the caliber.
 The French Revolution inspired many underprivileged people of the working class in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Mohammed was very interested in things that went beyond this everyday life, he often visited a cave known as Hira on the mountain of Nur, to meditate.
 The cave itself has outlived the times and offers a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 The cave is located on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, it's quite and altogether not easy to find, even though one knows that it exists, once one is in the cave, one is completely isolated.
 You see nothing but the clear, beautiful sky and the numerous surrounding mountains from the Innermost of the cave, very little of the world is to be seen or heard.
 Cheops pyramid is the only one of the seven wonders of the world which still stands today.
 Built in the third century BC by the Egyptians, the Cheops pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor the dead Pharaohs.
 Giza plateau, or the Giza necropolis in the Egyptian Tal der Toten, comprises several pyramids, several small graves, several temples, and the great Sphinx.
 The great pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built in honor of Cheops' wives and family members.
 The V-shaped symbol looks like a V, and the square-shaped symbol looks like a Klammer or a square with the bottom line missing.
 Upwards means that you start at the top and push the bow. Downwards means that you start at the frog (that's where your hand holds the bow) and pull the bow.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and 100 km thick on the far side.
 You can add your own Bleistift markings if you like, but remember that the printed page markings are there for musical reasons, and should therefore be respected normally.
 The panicked King Louis the fourteenth, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two small children (the 11-year-old Marie-Therese and the 4-year-old Louis-Charles) and the King's sister, Madame Elisabeth, were forced on October 6, 1789, in Versailles, by a mob of market women, to return to Paris.
 They traveled in a carriage back to Paris, surrounded by a screaming mob of people, who were shouting threats against the King and the Queen.
 The mob forced the King and Queen to open the windows of their carriages wide.
 At some point, a member of the enraged crowd swung the head of a King's Guard killed in Versailles before the eyes of the horrified queen.
 The war expenses of the U S . Imperialists in the conquest of the Philippines were borne by the Philippine people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial regime to cover the bulk of expenses, and the interest on loans flowed through the Wall Street banking houses in the name of the Philippine government.
 Naturally, the super profits, which were derived from the ongoing exploitation of the Philippine people, were the basic gains of U S . Imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the founding of the order.
 The epoch in which the events took place is commonly referred to as the high Middle Ages, a time in European history that spanned the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries (1000 to 1300 CE).
 The high Middle Ages followed the early Middle Ages, followed by the late Middle Ages, which ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a broad spectrum of ideas in practice, from the technology push or the technological imperative to the strict sense that human destiny is determined by an underlying logic that is associated with scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism share two general ideas, firstly that the development of technology itself follows a path largely beyond cultural or political influence, and secondly that technology itself has effects on societies that are inhertent rather than socially conditioned.
 One can argue that the automobile is inevitably bringing about the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network for only a small number of cars is economically not viable, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The widespread automobile ownership leads to a higher number of accidents on the streets, which in turn leads to the invention of new techniques in the health care industry to repair damaged bodies.
 The romantic had a strong, culturally deterministic element that drew from writers like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, it is geography that formed individuals, with time, customs and cultures emerged that were in harmony with the place of society, and these, because they stood in harmony with the place of society, were better than willfully oktroyed laws.
 As Paris is known today as the fashion capital of the world, so Constantinople was known as the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 and lasted until about 1100.
 His status took a lot of its indigenous character and identity, which was mainly due to the fact that the crusaders returned with gifts such as silk and spices, which were considered more valuable than the offer of the Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the title of the fashion capital of the world also wandered from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak in the time between the 10th and 11th and the 14th centuries.
 At the beginning, the clothing was strongly influenced by the culture of Byzantium in the East.
 In the West, however, styles lagged behind because of the slow communication channels by 25 to 30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, West Europe began to develop a style of its own. One of the most important developments of the time was that people, as a result of the Crusades, began to use buttons to fasten clothing.
 Bed-Rock-Wood-Farming is agriculture that aims to produce just enough food to cover the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 Subsistence farming is a simple, often biological, form of agriculture that uses saved, in-region seed, and combines it with Wechselfelderwirtschaft or other relatively simple techniques to maximize the yield.
 In the past, most farmers practiced subsistence farming, and in many developing countries, this is still the case.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded people who feel neglected by societal norms and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be defined in terms of age, ethnicity, class, location, and or gender of the members.
 The properties that define a Subculture as such can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual or geographic in nature or a combination of these factors.
 Members of a Subculture often signal their membership through an unmistakable and symbolic style, which includes fashion, habits, and jargon.
 One of the most common methods of illustrating the importance of socialization is to focus on the few unfortunate cases of children who, because of neglect, accident, or intentional abuse,
 Some of these children were held captive by humans (usually their own parents); in some cases, the neglect of the child was due to the inability of the parents to accept the child's significant intellectual or physical disabilities.
 Wolfskinder have possibly experienced massive child abuse or traumatic experiences before they were exposed or ran away.
 Others were supposed to have been raised by animals, some supposed to have lived alone in the wild.
 When it is completely raised by animals, the wild child shows behaviors (within the limits of his physical possibilities) that are almost completely in accordance with those of his specific caretaker, such as his fear or indifference towards humans.
 While project-based learning should make the learning process easier and more interesting, scaffolding goes a step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but rather a support that individuals in a novel learning situation use, such as when using a new computer program or beginning a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, but so is the little clamp in Microsoft office.
 Virtual help is built into the software and is supposed to question, to suggest, and to explain work steps that the student alone might not be able to accomplish.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse, to coercion.
 No child should be forced to grow up in an environment that is not caring, loving and education oriented, but many are forced to do so.
 For us, the system of foster care is a piece of security for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, a stable education and reliable health care.
 The foster care system is supposed to cover all the needs that they had in the home that they were removed from.
 The Internet connects both elements of mass communication, as well as the between-human communication.
 The specificities of the Internet have led to additional dimensions in terms of the utility and reward approach.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 Personal engagement and ongoing relationships were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they investigated audience reactions to Websites.
 The use of Video recordings led to important insights for the interpretation of Microexpression, facial movements lasting a few Milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that one can tell if someone is lying by correctly interpreting minimal changes in facial expression.
 In his article, The President's Speech, Oliver Sacks showed how people who, because of a brain injury, no longer understand language, can still correctly assess the honesty of people.
 He argues that the ability to interpret human behavior may be shared with animals like house dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two pools of genetic variation, hidden and expressed.
 Mutation sorgt for new genetic Variations and selection removes these from the pool of expressed Variations.
 Segregation and Recombination mix the variation between the two pools with each generation,
 Out in the savannah it's hard for a primate with a digestive system like ours to cover its amino acid needs from available plant sources.
 Besides, it has serious consequences if one fails to do it: growth depression, malnutrition and, finally, death.
 The easiest plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and seeds, but these are hard to digest for Primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal food sources (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easily digested, but also provide large amounts of proteins, which contain all essential amino acids.
 In general, it should not surprise us if our own ancestors solved their protein problem in a similar way to how chimpanzees in the Savannah do today.
 Sleep paralysis is the process of waking up during normal sleep periods and falling asleep a short time later (10-60 minutes).
 This can be achieved by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to awareness without fully waking you.
 If you're someone who SETS the alarm in the sleep, you can put it on the other side of the room so that you're forced to leave the bed to turn it off.
 Another biorhythm based possibility is to drink a lot of fluid, particularly water or tea, known for its diuretic effect, so that one is forced to get up to urinate.
 The amount of inner peace a person has, correlates inversely with the amount of tension in body and mind.
 The less tension, the more positive the life force. Every human being has the potential to find absolute rest and contentment.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha, but has been expanded to include the Mahayana path of love and numerous techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the Path of Compassionate love.
 With Kundalini yoga, the Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga poses, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualizations.
 In the center of Tibetan meditation stands the God-Yoga, through the visualization of various Gods the energy channels are cleansed, the chakras are opened and the enlightened consciousness arises.
 Germany was a common foe in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA after the war.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former Allies were now enemies and the cold war began.
 He should have the next 40 years and in reality, through proxy armies on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places,
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense had already completely collapsed and the only hope was in a retreat and a re-establishment along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans, however, became obsolete almost overnight as over 800,000 soldiers of the Red Army of the Soviet Union poured into the Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts, creating them after they had invaded the eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Riga peace treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties.
 The job of navies has traditionally been to ensure that your country maintains the ability to move your people and goods, while at the same time, interfering with your enemy's ability to move his people and goods.
 The Marine's traditional role was to ensure that a nation could continue to move people and goods, and at the same time to hinder the enemy's ability to move people and goods.
 One of the most significant recent examples of this is the North Atlantic campaign in World War II, in which the Americans tried to bring manpower and material over the Atlantic ocean to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy tried to stop this traffic mainly with U-Boats.
 If the Allies had failed, so Germany would probably have conquered Britain just like the rest of Europe.
 Goats were apparently already domesticated in the Zagros mountains in Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Antiquated cultures and peoples began to keep them as pets, to easily obtain their milk, fur, flesh, and skin.
 House goats were normally kept in herds that wandered on hills or other pasture lands.  They were tended by goat herders, quite similar to the better-known sheep herders, often children or adolescents.
 Already in the 16th century, England had built feeding lines.
 Although the feeding rails consisted only of parallel wooden boards, they allowed the horses, which pulled the wagons, to travel at higher speeds and to pull greater loads than on the somewhat rougher roads of the time.
 Soon, thresholds were introduced to secure the position of the rails, but it was soon realised that rails that carry a band of iron are more efficient.
 This was usual, but the iron caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden rails were replaced by iron rails. In 1767, the first fully iron rails were introduced.
 The first known mode of transportation was walking.
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not walk upright so regularly.
 Bipedal species are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have already walked on two legs seven million years ago.
 We can live more environmentally friendly, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even become activists to help alleviate future pain.
 In many cases, it's just like a symptomatic treatment. If you want not only temporary solutions, then we should find the root of the problem and treat it.
 It is really obvious that the world has changed very much because of the scientific and technological advancements of humanity and that the problems have become more serious because of Overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of the people.
 After its passage by the Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by the President John Hancock and the Secretary Charles Thomson, a few blocks away, was sent to the printing press of John Dunlap.
 In the course of the night, between 150 and 200 copies were made, which today are known as the Dunlap broadsides.
 The first public reading of the document was given by John Nixon in the hall of the Independence hall on July 8.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops in New York on July 9, and a copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap-Breitseids, which are still in existence, are the oldest copies of the document that still exist.
 Many paleontologists today believe that there is a group of dinosaurs that survived and are living today, we call them birds.
 Many see them not as dinosaurs, because they have feathers and can fly.
 Many things about birds still look like a dinosaur.
 They have feet with scales and claws, lay eggs and walk on both hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Nearly all computers used today are based on the processing of information that is coded in the form of Binary numbers.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, namely 0 or 1, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or Bits, to use computer jargon.
 An inner poisoning may not be immediately recognised, the symptoms, for example, vomiting, are so general that one cannot immediately make a diagnosis.
 The best sign of poisoning by swallowing can be the presence of an open container with medicines or toxic household chemicals.
 Look on the label for specific first aid instructions for that specific poison.
 The term Wanze is used by Entomologists in a formal sense for this insect group.
 This term is derived from the ancient familiarity with bed bugs, which are insects that are very adaptive in their ability to parasitize humans.
 Both raid and bed bugs are nidicol, adapted to living in the nest or the housing of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most widespread neurological disease in adults younger and middle age.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely to develop MS as men.
 A couple can decide that it is not in their own interest or in the interest of their child to raise a baby.
 These pairs can choose to adopt a plan for their baby.
 In adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main goal of science is to find out, using the scientific method, how the world works.
 It's not just about experimenting, though, where an experiment is a test designed to exclude one or more of the possible hypotheses.
 Scientists and philosophers concentrated on classical texts and especially on the Bible in Latin.
 Aristotle's views on all scientific questions, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the loss of Greek language, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific roots in Greece.
 Many observed rhythms in physiology and behaviour often depend in large part on the presence of biological clocks and their production by biological clocks.
 Behaviours that are determined by a cycle, not just reactions to signals from external cycles, are known in most living things, even bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining Oscillators that even in the absence of external signals,
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the major indications that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used Phages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They took two experiments, in which they either marked the DNA of the Phage with radioactive Phosphor or a protein in the Phage with radioactive Sulphur.
 Mutations can have various effects, depending on what kind of Mutation it is, what the significance of the piece of genetic material is, and whether it's in the germ line or not.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Naturnaher Tourismus zieht Leute an, die daran interessiert sind, Naturgebiete zu besuchen, um die Landschaft zu genießen, einschließlich der wilden Pflanzen and Tiere.
 Examples of activities on site are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning information about the ecosystem.
 An example of this is visiting, photographing and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small provincial towns in their cars to go to their workplaces and are passed by others whose workplace is the place they just left.
 In this dynamic pendulum, all are in some way connected to and supporting a transport system based on the private car.
 The science now points to the fact that this massive carbon economy has brought the biosphere out of one of its stable states, which has supported human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear similar complaints about the water quality or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems fail, why do they fail every day? Are transport engineers just incompetent, or is something fundamental going wrong here?
 Traffic flow is the investigation of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between them.
 Unfortunately, studying traffic flows is hard, since one cannot predict driver behavior with one hundred percent certainty.
 Luckily, Autofahrer tend to behave in a somewhat consistent way, so traffic flows have a certain constancy and can be roughly represented mathematically.
 To better illustrate the traffic flow, the relationships between the three most important properties were defined: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design, and operation of facilities at the roadway.
 Insects were the first animals to conquer the sky, their ability to fly helping them to evade enemies and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects can fold their wings along their body.
 Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad's a broad, Dad
 Today, Libellulae and Ephemeroptera are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarch claimed that the sun was at the center of the solar system.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite: that the solar system, including the sun (and even the other stars), revolved around the earth.
 That seems reasonable, does it not, since it does not appear that the earth moves?
 The Amazon is the second longest and the second largest river in the world, carrying more than eight times as much water as the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest River in the world, at times as wide as six miles.
 Whole 20 percent of the water that flows over the planet's rivers into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon main stream is 6,387 km long. It takes water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the building of pyramids out of stone continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza in their size and the technical perfection of their construction were never surpassed.
 Egyptians in the ancient New Kingdom marveled at the monuments of their ancestors, which were then about a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city has approximately 800 inhabitants, it is the smallest independent state in the world and the land with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for its legislation and official communication.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican city are Roman Catholic.
 Basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper have been known to humans since antiquity, as these all can be found in their original form in nature and can be extracted with primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, put forth the theory that all things are made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements, earth, water, air, and fire.
 This corresponded more to the four Aggregate States (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas, and plasma.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals. Remember, there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, naturally there are other metals like silver and gold.
 There are also alloys that contain small amounts of nonmetallic elements such as carbon.
 The universe consists in its entirety of matter. All matter consists of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so tiny that billions of them would fit in the point at the end of this sentence.
 As a result, the pencil became a good friend to many people after its invention.
 Unfortunately, the pencil has been pushed into the background with the advent of newer writing methods, so that it has been pushed into the background in its status and in its use.
 Today, people write messages on computer screens without ever having to come in the vicinity of a typewriter.
 One may be curious to see what will emerge from the keyboard when something newer comes along.
 The atomic bomb is based on the principle that energy is needed to bring together a core with many protons and neutrons.
 About as if one were rolling a heavy wagon up a hill,
 Some atoms have unstable cores, which means that they decay at low or even no stimulus.
 The surface of the moon consists of rock and dust. The outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 It is thinner under the Mare and thicker under the highland.
 On the near side, there could be more Maria, because the crust is thinner, and it was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 In-depth theories concentrate on finding what moves or appeals to people.
 These theories suggest that humans have certain needs and or wishes that are internalized over the course of their adulthood.
 These theories concern what motivates certain people to want exactly the things they do, and what influences in their surroundings cause them to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's theory of the need hierarchy and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, two behaviors can be noted when managers begin to lead their former colleagues. The one end of the spectrum is the attempt to remain one of the guys.
 These types of managers have problems making unpopular decisions, implementing disciplinary actions, performing performance evaluations, assigning responsibilities, and holding employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, one turns into an Individual, a not-against-able individual, who has to make everything different than the team has made it and who takes everything to own.
 Lastly, the team leader is responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to divisions between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are run according to the same excellence standards as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often have the function of a contact point for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members, as their teams can come together in different time zones that may not be considered by the local leadership.
 The presence of a real team, invisible team, is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the leadership team to which each of the members reports. The invisible team sets the standards for each member.
 Why would an organization undertake the time-consuming process of introducing a learning organization? A goal for the practical implementation of organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively utilized across all departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can emerge.
 In the end, the community work of an organization can lead to a new innovative method to meet customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, the leadership must develop a culture of innovation as well as a culture of shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuum concept as a method to help organizations become more efficient.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thereby defining the research field and making it much more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behaviour supports scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, such as trauma, injury and tumors, affect behavior and cause changes in some brain functions.
 Newly emerging Technologies are allowing us to see and to explore certain brain structures and processes for the first time.
 This puts us in a position to build Simulation models that help us understand the processes in our head.
 KI, though strongly associated with science fiction, is a major branch of computer science that deals with behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research in the field of KI includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are steering, setting up strategies and time plans, the ability to answer customer questions and to recognize handwriting, voice and facial expressions.
 Such things have become their own disciplines, concentrating on finding solutions to problems of real life.
 The KI system is today frequently used in the areas of economics, medicine, engineering and the military and has been built into numerous software applications for home computers and video games.
 Excursions are an important part of every school class. Not infrequently, a teacher would like to bring her or his students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 Virtual excursions offer a technical solution. The students can view museum pieces, visit an Aquarium, or view beautiful works of art.
 Sharing an excursion virtually is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, students at Bennet school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the state capital every year, and the Website is rebuilt each year, but the previous versions remain Online and serve as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help to improve the writing skills of students, though at the beginning of their Blogging experience, students often have sloppy grammar and spelling, but that normally changes when there is an audience.
 Since students are often a very critical audience, the Blog author makes an effort to improve his writing style to avoid criticism.
 Blogging forces the students to learn more about the world around them.
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to continue learning far beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of Blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical through the active reaction to Internet materials, and can enable students to define their positions in the context of the texts of others and to articulate their own perspectives on certain topics.
 Ottawa is Canada's charming, bilingual capital and is known for a range of art galleries and museums that present Canada's past and present.
 Further south are the Niagara falls, and to the north, the untouched beauty of nature in Muskoka and beyond.
 All these things and more make Ontario stand out to outsiders as what is considered to be typically Canadian.
 Large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that many are surprised by: there are more African-Americans living in the U S . than in Canada.
 The East African Islands are located in the Indian Ocean off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and, in terms of animal life, a continent unto itself.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations or belong to France and are known as luxurious seaside resorts.
 The Arabs brought Islam to the country, and in Comoros and Mayotte it was very successful.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese seafarer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 In the North, the region is bounded by the Sahel zone and in the South and West by the Atlantic ocean.
 It is recommended that all female travelers claim to be married regardless of their actual family status.
 Wearing a ring is helpful too (just not one that looks too expensive.
 Women should recognize that cultural differences can lead to what they would view as an assault, and that it's not unusual to be grabbed, pinned, etc.
 Stay consistent when you turn men down and don't be afraid to defend your standpoint (cultural differences, etc . mean nothing, it still means no!)
 Today's Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinides as a strategic port with the name Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in the year 1755.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city as Dar el Beida and it was called Casablanca by Spanish traders who set up trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the most uninteresting places to shop in all of Morocco.
 Around the old Medina it is easy to find places where traditional Moroccan wares like tagines, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole spectrum of Tinnef are sold, but that's only for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town of the Democratic Republic of Congo in the far East near Ruanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, especially the city center, under itself.
 While Goma is somewhat safe, any stay outside Goma should be carefully planned to learn about the ongoing fighting in the province of North Kivu.
 The city is also the starting point for climbing Nyiragongo volcano as well as for some of the cheapest gorilla tracking tours in Africa.
 You can use Bodabodas (Motorcycle taxis) to get around Goma. The usual price is about 500 Congolese Francs for the short ride.x
 This in combination with its relatively inaccessibility has led to Timbuktu being used as a metaphor for exotic, far-off lands.
 Although Timbuktu is known as a tourist attraction and has an airport, it is now a poor city.
 In the year 1990 it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites due to the threat of desert sand.
 It was one of Louis Gates PBS special, Wonders of the African World.
 The city stands in stark contrast to the rest of the cities of the country, because it has more of an Arabic than an African feel.
 The Kruger National Park (KNP) lies in the northeast of South Africa, bordering Mozambique in the east, Zimbabwe in the north and the Crocodile River in the south.
 The park has an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different Ecozones, each supporting a different animal world.
 It is one of South Africa's main attractions and is regarded as the flagship of South African National Parks.
 Like all South African National Parks, the park charges daily conservation and entrance fees.
 It can also be worthwhile to buy a Wild Card, which entitles you to either selected parks in South Africa or to all South African National parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the namesake for the territory Hong Kong and stands for many tourists in the middle.
 The buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline were compared with a Schiller diagram, which becomes visible through the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best views of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and take a ferry to the opposite shore of Kowloon.
 The majority of Hong Kong Island's urban development is dense and packed along the North Coast.
 This is the place that British colonists made their own, and if you're looking for traces of the colonial past of the area, this is a good starting point.
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove belt in the world and stretch over 80 km from the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland to the coast.
 The Sundarbans were declared a UNESCO world heritage site, and the part of the forest that lies within the Indian state is designated as Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are not only Mangrove swamps they also include some of the last remaining stands of the mighty jungle that once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans stretch over an area of 3,850 km², of which a third is covered by water and marshes.
 The Sundarbans are a nature reserve since 1966, and estimates say that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses run all day from the district-wide bus station (on the other side of the river), with most buses, especially those heading east and Jakar/Bumthang, running between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As buses between the districts are often full, it is recommended to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most districts are served by small Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and stable.
 Sammeltaxis offer a fast and comfortable way to get to nearby places like Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a Schrägseilbrücke. It spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 Their two towers are 83 meters high, their length is 378 meters and they have two lanes with a width of 3.50 m.
 The height under the bridge is 15 meters, the construction works were completed in August 2011, but the opening for traffic was only in March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to fully open in September 2017, and it is expected that the Brazilian customs control points will then be finished.
 The Guaraní were the most significant indigenous group that inhabited the present-day East Paraguay, living as a semi-nomadic hunter-gatherer society.
 The Chaco region was also home to other groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly the great province of West Indies, arose in the sixteenth century as a result of the Spanish conquerors meeting the indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began the colonization, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the founding of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for its polo team and players to be among the best in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on Las Cañitas Polo fields.
 Smaller tournaments and matches can also be watched here at other times of the year.x
 Information about competitions and sales outlets for polo tickets can be found at the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland pound, whose value is pegged to the value of the British pound.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the island, which is located opposite the FIC West Store in Stanley.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the Islands and at Stanley credit card outlets, although U.S. dollars are frequently accepted as well.
 On the remote Islands, credit cards are unlikely to be accepted, although British and U.S. currency may be accepted, inquire with the owners beforehand as to which payment method is accepted.
 It is nearly impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands themselves, so you should exchange the money before you leave the Islands.
 Since Montevideo lies south of the equator, it is summer there when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo lies in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures over 30°C are common.
 Winter can be deceptively cool: temperatures rarely go below freezing, but wind and humidity make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no distinct rainy or dry seasons, as the amount of rainfall remains about the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing humans, the wildlife are still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 As per the Park's executive producer, visitors are to keep at least 100 yards from bears and wolves and 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 No matter how peaceful bison, elk, bear, and practically all large animals can act, it can happen that they will attack.
 Every year dozens of visitors are injured because they do not keep enough distance, these animals are big, wild and possibly dangerous, so let them have enough space.
 Be aware that odors can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid carrying or cooking strongly scented foods and keep a clean, safe camp.
 Apia is the capital city of Samoa, located on the island of Upolu, and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been Samoa's official capital since 1959.
 The harbor was the scene of an unfortunate standoff between the Navy in the year 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Great Britain refused to leave the harbor.
 All ships, with the exception of a British cruiser, were sunk, and nearly 200 Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau movement-organized independence struggle, a peaceful gathering in the city led to the killing of the top chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland stretches over two harbours, so there are many beaches. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore lie on the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Almost all are sandy beaches with safe bathing and most offer shade, provided by Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are located at the Waitemata Harbour in the upper-middle class suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 There are family beaches that are sometimes overcrowded, with a nice shopping promenade along the coast, and swimming is safe here.
 The most important local beer is Number One, it's not a complex beer, but it's nice and refreshing.
 There are many French wines to drink, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better tolerated.
 The local tap water can be drunk without worry, but if you're concerned, you'll also find bottled water without a problem.
 For Australians, the idea of a flat white is foreign. A small, black coffee is an espresso, cappuccino is filled high with foam, and tea is served without milk.
 The hot chocolate corresponds to Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive, but excellent.
 Many trips to the Reef find the whole year through and injuries because of any of these causes on the Reef are rare.
 Nevertheless, you should follow the advice of authorities, pay attention to all signs, and in particular, pay attention to safety warnings.
 Jellyfish occur inshore and in the vicinity of river mouths from October to April north of 1770, and can occasionally occur outside this time frame.
 Sharks exist, but they rarely attack humans, most sharks are afraid of humans and would swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles live not actively in the sea, their primary habitat is in the mouths of rivers north of Rockhampton.
 A booking in advance gives the traveller the assurance that when he arrives at his destination he will have a place to sleep.
 Travel agents often have arrangements with specific hotels, although you may also be able to book other accommodation forms, such as tented sites, through a travel agent.
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, transport to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 You can also hold your reservation for you in case you need time to review the offer or to obtain additional documents for your travel destination, such as a Visa.
 Any changes or inquiries should be directed first to the travel agency and not directly to the hotel.
 At many festivals, the vast majority of festival goers decide to camp on site, and most festival goers hold this to be an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be near the action, you have to get there early to get a camping spot near the music.
 Think about it, on parts of the festival, music will still be playing late into the night, even though the music on the main stages has stopped.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the northern East Sea in winter, check the location of the cabin, as the breaking of ice can cause quite horrific noise for the most affected.
 The cruises to St Petersburg also offer time for a stay in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement (see conditions).
 Casinos are usually very concerned with keeping guests as long as possible and spending as much money as possible.
 They normally have a special offer of food, drink and entertainment to keep the guests happy and to ensure that they stay.
 Some gambling establishments offer alcoholic drinks free of charge, but intoxication impairs judgment, and all good players know how important it is to remain sober.
 Whoever drives in high latitudes or over mountain passes should reckon with snow, ice and temperatures below freezing point.
 On icy and snowy roads, the grip is low and one cannot drive as if on bare asphalt.
 In very short time, a lot of snow can fall in very short time, so much snow can fall in very short time,
 The visibility can also be impaired by falling or blowing snow or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.
 On the other hand, ice and snowy conditions are normal in many countries, and traffic runs throughout most of the year.
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the highlight for many visitors.
 Safari is a word that is used in the common language to describe a land trip, especially in the Savannah, to observe the overwhelming African wildlife.
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, tend to get close to cars, and the standard equipment allows for a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and Leopards are often shy and you can better observe them with a telescope.
 A foot safari, also known as a Bushwalk, a Walkabout, or a Footing, consists of a walk that either lasts a few hours or several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events held at other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic summer games, after having already hosted the games in 1964.
 If you've booked your flights and accommodation for the year 2020 before the shift was announced, you could find yourself in a difficult situation.
 The cancellation policies vary, but by late March, most cancellation policies because of the Coronavirus were not in effect until July 2020, for the Olympics were planned.
 It is estimated that most tickets for the event will cost between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, an average ticket around 7,000 yen.
 Wet clothing can help drying when you're not in the room. Many hotels provide irons and ironing boards, even if you're not in the room.
 If no iron is available or one does not want to wear ironed socks, one can try using a hair dryer if one is available.
 Be careful not to heat the fabric too hot (this can cause it to shrink or in extreme cases, cause burns).
 There are various methods for cleaning water, some of which have proven to be more effective at countering certain hazards.
 In some areas, it's enough to boil water for a minute, in others, it's several minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies greatly, and if you have concerns, then you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travelers can encounter animal pests that they are not familiar with from their home regions.
 Unclean animals can destroy food, cause irritations or, at worst, even transmit allergic reactions, poison or transmit diseases.
 Infections as such or dangerous animals that can injure or kill humans are usually not classified as pests.
 Free shopping is the ability to buy goods that are exempt from certain taxes and duties at designated locations.
 Travellers whose destination has a high taxation can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on products like alcoholic drinks and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmount on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway is the largest driver's challenge, as it often leads through remote, unsettled country.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, stay alert: steep grades, narrow lanes and sharp curves predominate here.
 The speed limits are markedly lower than in the preceding and following sections -- generally 35-40 mph -- and their strict enforcement is even more important than usual.
 Interestingly, though, the mobile phone coverage here is much better than in many other areas of the route, such as the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German Backwares are quite tasty. In Bavaria they are quite rich and varied, as well as in the Southern neighbor Austria.
 Obstgebäck is widely available, with apples being sold throughout the year and cherries and pears being used in summer.
 Many German baked goods contain almonds, hazelnuts or other nuts. Popular cakes often go particularly well with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want to make small, but rich, baked goods, then try what is known in some regions as Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 A curry is a dish that is based on herbs and spices, together with either meat or vegetables.
 A curry can be either dry or wet depending on the amount of liquid.
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in southern India and some other coastal regions of the Subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 With a selection of 17,000 Islands, Indonesian food is a umbrella term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 If the term is used without further attributes, it generally refers to the food originally from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Today, Javanese cuisine, which is widespread throughout the island group, offers a variety of simply spiced dishes, with peanuts, chili, sugar, and a range of aromatic spices as the main flavorings.
 Steeple bells are aids for the feet of riders, which hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They give the rider more stability, but there are safety concerns because the rider's feet could potentially get caught in them.
 If a rider falls off the horse and gets his foot caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged along if the horse goes through.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, fairly narrow sole.
 Additionally, some saddles, especially English saddles, have safety buckles that allow a stirrup leather to fall off the saddle as soon as it is pulled backward by a falling rider.
 The Cochamó Valley, Chile's most important climbing destination, known as the Yosemite National Park of South America, with a variety of large Granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks offer a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world discover new routes along the walls, which offer endless possibilities for it.
 Skiing and snowboarding are popular sports in which one attaches skis or a snowboard to one's feet and rides down a slope.
 Skiing is a popular recreational activity with many enthusiasts, occasionally known as ski penner, who plan their entire holiday around skiing at a specific location.
 The idea of skiing is very old—cave paintings depicting skiers go back to 5000 BC.
 The origins of skiing as a sport go back at least to the 17th century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Ski touring with a backpack: This activity is also called ski touring or ski touring.
 It resembles alpine touring skiing or mountaineering, but does not necessarily include it, as the latter is performed in steep terrain and requires much firmer ski and boots.
 Consider the ski route like a comparable hiking route.
 In good conditions, you are able to cover somewhat greater distances than when hiking, but very rarely will you reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy rucksack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but has numerous independent countries, and normally one would have to apply for multiple Visas and go through multiple passport controls when travelling through several countries.
 Schengen, however, works in this respect a little like a country.
 As long as one stays in this zone, one can normally cross the borders without having to go through passport control again.
 Using ships to transport goods is by far the most efficient way to move large amounts of people and goods across oceans.
 There is no generally accepted definition of what constitutes an antiquity, and some tax authorities define antiquities as goods over 100 years old.
 The definition shows geographic deviations where the age limit in places like North America can be lower than in Europe.
 Handmade products could be described as antique, although they are younger than similar products from mass production.
 The reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around the trade is also important for many who work in other professions.
 Also in the past, not all Sámi have raised reindeer in a large scale, but have lived from fishing, hunting and similar.
 Today, many Sámi work in modern professions, tourism being an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi region.
 Even though the term Gypsy is used primarily by Non-Roma, it is often perceived as offensive, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of Roma.
 If a travel advisory is issued for the country you are visiting, your travel insurance or trip cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments, but their advice is tailored to their own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may be confronted with situations that are different from Europeans or Arabs.
 Consultations are only a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views depicted are often superficial, general and in comparison to the more detailed information that can be found elsewhere, too strongly simplified.
 Weather is the umbrella term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, severe social disruption or the loss of human life.
 Weather can occur anywhere on the planet and there are various types of it, depending on geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and wildfires are forms and effects of severe weather, as well as thunderstorms, tornadoes, flash floods and waterspouts.
 Regional and seasonal weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms, and dust storms.
 Travellers are urged to watch out for any type of weather that affects their area, as this can affect all travel plans.
 Anyone planning to travel to a war zone should undertake professional training for it.
 A search on the Internet for a course on hostile environments will probably show the address of a local firm.
 A course covers all the problems discussed here in general much more detailed, normally in combination with practical experience.
 A course is usually between 2 and 5 days long and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid and sometimes weapons training.
 There are numerous books and journals on survival in the wilderness, but only a few publications on war zones.
 Travellers planning to have a sex change operation overseas must ensure they have valid identification documents for their return journey.
 The readiness of governments to issue passports with non-disclosed gender or documents that have been updated to the desired name and gender is different.
 The willingness of foreign governments to recognise these documents is also very different.
 The searches at security checks are in the time after the 11th of September 2001 far more intrusive.
 Transgender people should not expect their privacy and dignity to be intact when passing through the scanners.
 Rip-Tide currents are the returning current of waves broken at the shore, often at reefs or similar.
 Because of the underwater topology, the return flow concentrates in a few deeper areas and a fast current can form there.
 Most deaths occur through exhaustion when trying to swim back against the current, which can prove impossible.
 When you come out of the stream, it's not harder to swim back than normal.
 Try to get somewhere where you won't be caught again, or, alternatively, if you've been spotted, maybe wait for rescue.
 The return shock comes earlier than the culture shock (the honeymoon phase is not so pronounced), lasts longer and can be more serious.
 Travellers who find it easy to adapt to the new culture find it particularly hard to adapt to their home culture.
 When one returns home after a foreign stay, one has adapted to a different culture and dropped some of one's home culture's behaviors.
 When you first traveled abroad, the people were probably patient and understanding because they knew that travelers in a new land have to adapt.
 Man expects perhaps not that even returning travellers need patience and understanding.
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and while it's still, before the show begins.
 Normally, you hear tourists and vendors all the time, the history of the sounds and the lights is just like a history book.
 The Sphinx is used as a background and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are depicted on the pyramids, with the various pyramids being illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most stations, with sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago lies 120 km north of the peninsula. The largest is King George Island with the settlement Villa Las Estrellas.
 Other Islands are Livingston Island and Deception, where the flooded Caldera of an still active volcano provides a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworthland is the region south of the Halbinsel, bounded by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the Halbinsel go here into the plateau and then rise again to form the 360 km long chain of Ellsworth mountains, which are divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part or the Sentinel range has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, whose highest peak is Mount Vinson at 4,892 m.
 In remote areas without handy coverage, a satellite phone can be the only option.
 A satellite telephone is generally no substitute for a mobile phone, as one needs to be outdoors and in a clear line of sight of a satellite to make a call.
 The service is frequently used by ships, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that need data and voice communications.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you further information about the connection to this service.
 A growing option for people planning to take a year out are study and course options abroad.
 This is particularly popular with school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before university without their studies being affected.
 In many cases, participation in a foreign bridge year program can actually improve your chances for a college education in your home country.
 In general, a fee is charged for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a great destination for boating trips. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of Islands in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 For the Archipelago and lakes you do not need a yacht.
 Even though the coastal Island groups and the largest lakes are actually large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even Kayaks offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national pastime in Finland, with every sixth or eighth person owning a boat.
 This is, however, comparable to Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but otherwise quite unique (in the Netherlands, for example, the ratio is one to forty).
 Most pure East Coast cruises include a longer stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic city for several whole days while you return in the evening and spend the night on the ship.
 If you only go ashore in the course of the Bordexkursionen, you do not need a separate Visa.
 Some cruises offer Berlin in Germany as a destination in their brochures, as you can see on the map above, Berlin is far from the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flight can be a terrifying experience for people in any age and from any walk of life, especially if they've never flown before or have a traumatic experience behind them.
 For that, you need to re-establish diplomatic relations with your neighbors.
 To learn more about the functioning of airplanes and the procedures during a flight can help some overcome the fear that comes with the unknown or with the feeling of having no control.
 Courier firms are well paid for the speedy delivery of things, often the time is a very important factor in business documents, trade goods or spare parts for urgent repairs.
 On some routes, the larger firms use their own planes, but on other routes and with smaller firms, difficulties arose.
 When they shipped things via air freight, the unloading and customs clearance on some routes could take several days.
 The only way to get it through faster was to send it as Unaccompanied Baggage.
 The obvious method, in first or business class, is to throw a thick Batzen of cash at it, or, even better, to get your own firm to pay for it.
 That's not cheap, though: as a rough guide, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal Economy fare for Business and up to eleven times for First.
 In general, it is pointless to search for discounts on direct flights from A to B even for business or first-class seats.
 Airlines know very well that there is a core group of flyers who are willing to pay a lot of money and demand corresponding prices for the privilege of getting to their destination quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the native language is Romanian, but many people also speak Russian.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that has suffered under ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the founding of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, the economic relations between these two parts of the Republic of Moldova could be restored.
 The most important religion in Moldova is the Christian Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transportation hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna is today a modern, progressive and business-minded commercial center, situated on a huge Bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The broad boulevards, glazed buildings and modern shopping centers are marked by classic red-tiled roofs, the market from the 18th century, as well as old mosques and churches, although the city exudes more of a Mediterranean atmosphere than that of traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers views of the nearby Island of Eysturoy and has an unusual eight-sided church.
 On the cemetery there are some interesting marble sculptures of pigeons on some graves.
 It is worthwhile to stroll through the fascinating village for half an hour.
 In the North and in the immediate vicinity lies the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became known to foreigners after Lord Byron had described its Pracht in leuchtenden Farben.
 The Scotturb-Bus 403 runs regularly over Cabo da Roca to Sintra.
 Visit also in the North the great shrine of our Lady of Fatima, a place world-famous for its Marian apparitions.
 Please bear in mind that you are visiting a mass grave site and a place that has almost unimaginable significance for a huge part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their time here, and many more with relatives who were murdered there or worked to death, Jews and Non-Jews alike.
 Please treat this site with the dignity, the reverence and the respect that it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by adding or scratching graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half the population preferring Catalan, the vast majority understanding it, and almost everyone being able to speak Spanish.
 The most signs are only in Catalan, as it is legally the first official language.
 Spanish is also widely spoken in public transportation and other institutions.
 Normal announcements in the Metro are exclusively in Catalan, but unforeseen disruptions are announced by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be egoistic, rude and arrogant.
 Even though this is often an inaccurate cliché, one finds oneself in Paris at one's best when one shows one's best side and behaves like someone who is well-bred.
 The barbaric exterior of Paris vanishes quite quickly when you display basic manners.
 The National Park of the Plitwitzer Seen is heavily wooded, there are mainly beeches, firs and tanners and it offers a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a remarkable diversity of plant communities, thanks to its many Microclimates, different soils and varying altitudes.
 The area is also home to a huge variety of animal and bird life.
 There are rare fauna like European Brown bears, wolves, eagles, owls, lynx, Wildcats and Auerhühner as well as many generally more common species.
 When visiting the monasteries, women must wear skirts that reach to the knees and also cover their shoulders.
 In most monasteries there are Wrap-Around robes for women who come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially one in bright colors, the monk or nun at the entrance will give you a smile.
 Analogously, men must wear pants that reach over the knee.
 These can also be borrowed from the Bestand at the entrance, but the clothing is not washed after each user, so you may not feel comfortable in these robes.
 Mallorcan cuisine, like that of similar areas of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and always uses olive oil.
 A simple, popular evening meal, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato, and any available ingredients like cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 It makes reading easier, but writing is somewhat difficult because one has to determine whether a verb or a noun is used as the main word.
 Italian pronunciation is relatively easy, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The most important letters to watch out for are c and g, as their pronunciation varies depending on the following vowel.
 They are still trying to determine just how large the crash was and how the earth will be affected.
 Persian is a relatively simple and largely regular language.
 Deswegen would the reading of this introductory grammar help you to learn much about Persian grammar and to better understand formulations.
 When one speaks a romance language, it is naturally easier to learn Portuguese.
 People who speak some Spanish might be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is so similar that it need not be learned extra.
 Vormoderne Star observatories are today normally no longer in operation and serve as museums or educational sites.
 During their high phase, light pollution was not the problem it is today, and they are generally located in cities or on University campuses that are easier to reach than those built in more recent times.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge installations in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The viewing of cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept came from China, where peach blossoms were the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were held by the Emperor only for himself and other nobles in the vicinity of the Imperial Palace.
 Plants look their best in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove just one.
 When one visits a formally laid out garden and takes samples, one is also thrown out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to find your way around and to buy almost anything after arrival.
 Since you are in the extreme Tropics and only a few degrees north of the equator, you must expect both heat (always) and strong sunshine (when the sky is clear, less often).
 There are also a few buses that go north to Hebron, the traditional burial site of the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are taking goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good basis for holiday planning.
 For example, a castle tour in the Loire Valley, a Rhine Valley tour, or a cruise to interesting cities on the Danube or a boat ride along the Erie Canal.
 They also host popular hiking and biking routes.
 In Christianity, Christmas is one of the most important holidays and is regarded as the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions around the feast were also adopted by Non-Believers in Christian and Non-Christian lands.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night at some open place to see the sunrise.
 There are natural Christian-Theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 Traditional churches often hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night, with the feasting beginning at midnight, when the resurrection of Christ is celebrated.
 All animals that originally arrived on the Islands came here either by swimming, flying, or by being washed ashore.
 Due to the great distance from the continent, mammals were not able to make the journey, which made the giant tortoise the main prey animal on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the first humans arrived on the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, rats, cats and dogs.
 When you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience the Polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This offers a good opportunity to see the northern lights, as the sky is more or less dark around the Uhr.
 Since the areas are thinly populated and the light pollution is often no problem, you can also enjoy the starry sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners may be used to.
 Suits are part of the business attire, and colleagues address each other by their family names or job titles.
 The harmony at work is of decisive importance, with the focus being on the group performance rather than on the praise for individual performance.
 Oftentimes, workers must seek the approval of their supervisors for all decisions they make and are expected to follow their bosses' instructions unconditionally.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3646098960962843, 'precisions': [0.6658381108928356, 0.4296937027286783, 0.2963043762816877, 0.20847217784269867], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0089802192467943, 'translation_length': 24943, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 62.636996745929906, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}